Utah statutes.
58-74-301.   Licensure required.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of court reporting.

(2)  The division shall issue to any person who qualifies under this chapter a license to practice as a certified court reporter.



Amended by Chapter 77, 2004 General Session

